Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 1 Composition of Senate

22-1-1.
Composition of senate.

Commencing on the first Tuesday in January, 2023, the senate shall consist of thirty-eight (38) senators, one senator being elected from each of the senatorial districts into which the state is divided in §

22-1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 2, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 2, effective February 16, 2022.